nl: Tekenpasser verstelmechanisme: Boog (veer); Middenwiel; Dubbel (snelverstelling + fijninstelling); Micrometerschroef; Snelverstelscharnier; Overige
pt-PT: Mecanismo de ajuste do compasso de desenho: Arco (mola); Roda central; Duplo (ajuste rápido e fino); Parafuso micrométrico; Dobradiça de ajuste rápido; Outro
fi: Tarkkuusharpin säätömekanismi: Jousiharppi; Keskipyörä; Kaksiosainen (pikasäätö ja hienosäätö); Mikrometriruuvi; Pikasäätösarana; Muu
pt-BR: Mecanismo de ajuste do compasso de desenho: Arco (mola); Roda central; Duplo (ajuste rápido + ajuste fino); Parafuso micrométrico; Dobradiça de ajuste rápido; Outros
zh-TW: 繪圖圓規調整機制: 弓形 (彈簧); 中心滾輪; 雙重 (快速設定 + 微調); 測微螺絲; 快速設定鉸鏈; 其他
lt-LT: Braižymo skriestuvo reguliavimo mechanizmas: Lankinis (spyruoklinis); Centrinis ratukas; Dvejopas (greitas nustatymas ir tikslus reguliavimas); Mikrometrinis varžtas; Greitai nustatomas lankstas; Kita
nb: Justeringsmekanisme for kompass: Fjærbue; Senterhjul; Dobbel (hurtiginnstilling + finjustering); Mikrometerskrue; Hurtiginnstillingshengsel; Annet
de: Einstellmechanismus des Zeichenzirkels: Federbogen; Mittelrad; Dual (Schnelleinstellung + Feineinstellung); Mikrometerschraube; Schnellverstellscharnier; Sonstige
vi: Cơ chế điều chỉnh compa vẽ kỹ thuật: Cung (lò xo); Bánh răng trung tâm; Kép (cài đặt nhanh + điều chỉnh vi chỉnh); Vít panme; Bản lề cài đặt nhanh; Khác
es: Mecanismo de ajuste del compás de dibujo: Arco (resorte); Rueda central; Dual (ajuste rápido y fino); Tornillo micrométrico; Bisagra de ajuste rápido; Otro
sl-SI: Mehanizem za nastavljanje risarskega šestila: Na vzmet; Sredinsko kolesce; Dvojno (hitra in fina nastavitev); Mikrometrski vijak; Tečaj za hitro nastavitev; Drugo
el: Μηχανισμός ρύθμισης διαβήτη σχεδίασης: Τόξο (ελατήριο); Κεντρικός τροχός; Διπλός (γρήγορη ρύθμιση + μικρορύθμιση); Μικρομετρική βίδα; Μεντεσές γρήγορης ρύθμισης; Άλλο
en: Drafting compass adjustment mechanism: Bow (spring); Center wheel; Dual (quick-set + fine adjustment); Micrometer screw; Quick-set hinge; Other
sk-SK: Mechanizmus nastavenia kružidla: Pružinové; Stredové koliesko; Duálne (rýchle + jemné nastavenie); Mikrometrická skrutka; Pánt s rýchlym nastavením; Iný
bg-BG: Механизъм за настройка на пергел: Пружина; Централно колело; Двоен (бърза настройка + фина настройка); Микрометричен винт; Панта за бърза настройка; Друго
sv: Justeringsmekanism för kompass: Fjädercirkel; Mitthjul; Dubbel (snabbinställning + finjustering); Mikrometerskruv; Snabbjusterande gångjärn; Övrigt
pl: Mechanizm regulacji cyrkla kreślarskiego: Sprężynowy; Śruba rzymska; Podwójny (szybkie ustawianie + precyzyjna regulacja); Śruba mikrometryczna; Zawias do szybkiego ustawiania; Inne
hu: Rajzkörző beállító mechanizmus: Ívelt (rugós); Középső kerék; Kettős (gyorsbeállító + finombeállító); Mikrométercsavar; Gyorsbeállító zsanér; Egyéb
it: Meccanismo di regolazione del compasso da disegno: A compasso (molla); Rotella centrale; Doppio (regolazione rapida e fine); Vite micrometrica; Cerniera a regolazione rapida; Altro
cs: Mechanismus nastavení kružítka: Pružinové rameno; Středové kolečko; Duální (rychlé nastavení + jemné doladění); Mikrometrický šroub; Rychloupínací kloub; Jiné
ro-RO: Mecanismul de reglaj al compasului de desen tehnic: Tip arc (tensiune); Rotiță centrală; Dual (reglaj rapid + reglaj fin); Șurub micrometric; Articulație cu reglaj rapid; Altele
da: Justeringsmekanisme til passer: Bue (fjeder); Centreringshjul; Dobbelt (hurtig indstilling + finjustering); Mikrometerskrue; Hurtigt indstilleligt hængsel; Andet
hr-HR: Mehanizam za podešavanje kompasa za crtanje: Luk (opruga); Središnji kotačić; Dvostruko (brzo postavljanje + fino ugađanje); Mikrometarski vijak; Šarka za brzo postavljanje; Ostalo
fr: Mécanisme de réglage du compas: Balustre (à ressort); Molette centrale; Double (réglage rapide et micrométrique); Vis micrométrique; Charnière à réglage rapide; Autre
ja: 製図用コンパス調整メカニズム: バウ (スプリング); センターホイール; デュアル (クイックセット+微調整); マイクロメーターねじ; クイックセットヒンジ; その他
tr: Çizim pusulası ayarlama mekanizması: Yaylı; Orta tekerlek; Çift (hızlı ayar + hassas ayar); Mikrometre vidası; Hızlı ayarlı menteşe; Diğer
zh-CN: 绘图圆规调节机构: 弓形（弹簧）; 中央拨轮; 双重（快调 + 微调）; 测微螺钉; 快调铰链; 其他
ru: Механизм регулировки чертежного циркуля: Пружинный; Центральное колесико; Двойной (быстрая установка + точная настройка); Микрометрический винт; Шарнир быстрой установки; Другое
th: กลไกการปรับตั้งของวงเวียนเขียนแบบ: คันโค้ง (สปริง); ล้อหมุนกลาง; คู่ (ตั้งเร็ว + ปรับละเอียด); สกรูไมโครมิเตอร์; บานพับแบบตั้งเร็ว; อื่นๆ
ko: 제도용 컴퍼스 조정 메커니즘: 보우(스프링); 센터 휠; 듀얼(퀵 세트 + 미세 조정); 마이크로미터 나사; 퀵 세트 힌지; 기타